Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB124.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 337 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section, "living wage" means a wage level equivalent to or greater
than at least one hundred thirty percent (130%) of the poverty level for the county
in which the employee is physically located for his or her employment.
(2) Any employer that begins doing business in Kentucky on or after the effective
date of this Act shall be required to pay all of its employees at least a living wage
for the employee's starting base salary if the business:
(a) Receives any local, state, or federal government subsidies, economic
incentives, tax incentives, financing, workforce assistance, loans, or grants;
(b) Is located in an enterprise zone or opportunity zone in Kentucky and tax
incentives have been provided to or will be provided in the future to the
business or any investor in the business;
(c) Contracts with any local, state, or federal government agency to provide
goods or services; or
(d) Leases or subleases any local, state, or federal government property.
Page 1 of 1
XXXX 12/2/2025 11:09 AM Jacketed